Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-109
Financial institution examiner; failure to report unlawful conduct or unsafe condition; penalty.

If any financial institution examiner has knowledge of the insolvency or unsafe condition of any financial institution chartered by the department, that there are bad or doubtful assets in any such financial institution, that any such financial institution or any of its officers has violated any law governing the conduct of the financial institution, or that it is unsafe and inexpedient to permit any such financial institution to continue business, and the financial institution examiner fails to immediately report such fact in writing over his or her signature to the director, he or she is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor and shall forfeit his or her office.

Laws 1923, c. 191, § 36, p. 457;

Laws 1925, c. 30, § 8, p. 127;

C.S.1929, § 8-110;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 9, p. 139;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-110;

R.S.1943, § 8-108;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 9, p. 137;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 37;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 10.